Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-216
Municipality; accept gifts of money; expend.

A municipality is authorized to accept, receive, and receipt for federal money, and other money, either public or private, for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, or operation of airports and other air navigation facilities, and sites therefor, and to comply with the provisions of the laws of the United States and any rules and regulations made thereunder for the expenditure of federal money upon such airports and other air navigation facilities.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 9(1), p. 163.